Wyoming, session 2026, SF0093.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 20-2-206 is created to read:

20-2-206. Child custody; required findings.
SF0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0026

If the disposition of children or a determination of
custody made under this article does not allocate custody
equally among both parents, the court's order or decree
shall include specific findings of facts, based on sworn
testimony presented at any hearing held, regarding why the
factors specified in W.S. 20-2-201(a) supports the custody
determination made and the conclusions of law supporting
the court's decision.

Section 2. W.S. 20-2-101(g), 20-2-201(a) by creating
a new paragraph (xi), by renumbering (xi) as (xii), (d) and
by creating a new subsection (j), 20-2-204(c) and
20-2-309(a)(iv) are amended to read:

20-2-101. Void and voidable marriages defined;
annulments.

(g) All decrees of annulment may include provisions
for the custody and support of children pursuant to this
article, W.S. 20-2-201 through 20-2-204, 20-2-206 and
20-2-301 through 20-2-315 and for the division of property
pursuant to W.S. 20-2-114.
SF0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0026

20-2-201. Disposition and maintenance of children in
decree or order; access to records.

(a) In granting a divorce, separation or annulment of
a marriage or upon the establishment of paternity pursuant
to W.S. 14-2-401 through 14-2-907, the court may make by
decree or order any disposition of the children that
appears most expedient and in the best interests of the
children. In determining the best interests of the child,
the court shall consider, but is not limited to, the
following factors:

(xi) Evidence that either parent has knowingly
provided false information to the court regarding any prior
or pending civil or criminal action regarding domestic
violence, sexual assault, child abuse, child abandonment or
child neglect;

(xi)(xii) Any other factors the court deems
necessary and relevant.

SF0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0026
(d) The court shall order custody in well defined
terms to promote understanding and compliance by the
parties. In determining custody a court shall not favor or
disfavor any form of custody. Custody shall be crafted to
promote the best interests of the children, and may include
any combination of joint, shared or sole custody subject to
the following:

(i) For temporary orders or decrees determining
custody, the court shall order shared custody on a
temporary basis pending the final custody disposition,
unless the court expressly finds by a preponderance of the
evidence that shared custody would not be in the children's
best interests;

(ii) For final orders or decrees determining
custody after shared custody has been ordered under
paragraph (i) of this subsection, the court shall consider
the shared custody of the children and hear from both
parents on the shared custody arrangement. The court shall
order shared custody for the final order or decree unless
the court finds that shared custody was unsuccessful or
SF0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0026
unless the court finds facts and circumstances showing that
shared custody is not in the children's best interests;

(iii) If the court does not order shared custody
in the temporary or final custody order or decree, the
court shall explain in writing the reasons for finding that
shared custody is not in the children's best interests.

(j) For purposes of this article:

(i) "Joint legal custody" means that both
parties share the decision-making rights, responsibilities
and authority related to the health, education and welfare
of the child;

(ii) "Joint physical custody" means that the
child physically resides with each party for a
substantially equal amount of time each calendar year, with
a parental plan crafted to promote the child's best
interests;

SF0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0026
(iii) "Shared custody" means a child custody
arrangement that includes both joint legal custody and
joint physical custody;

(iv) The terms "time" and "visitation" are used
interchangeably for purposes of this article.

20-2-204. Enforcement and modification.

(c) A court having jurisdiction may modify an order
concerning the care, custody and visitation of the children
if there is a showing by either parent of a material change
in circumstances since the entry of the order in question
and that the modification would be in the best interests of
the children pursuant to W.S. 20-2-201(a) and subject to
the requirements of W.S. 20-2-206(a). In any proceeding in
which a parent seeks to modify an order concerning child
custody or visitation, proof of repeated, unreasonable
failure by the custodial parent to allow visitation to the
other parent in violation of an order may be considered as
evidence of a material change of circumstances. Any
modification under this subsection shall be subject to the
SF0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0026
limitations and requirements of W.S. 20-2-205 and
20-2-206(a).

20-2-309. Contents of orders; change of address or
employment; income withholding entered; payment.

(a) All orders shall include the:

(iv) Right of either party or, when appropriate,
the department of family services to petition to enforce an
order pursuant to W.S. 20-2-201 through 20-2-204, 20-2-206,
20-2-310 and 20-2-311(d).

Section 3. This act shall apply to all petitions,
motions and actions for establishing the custody of a child
filed on and after July 1, 2026.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0093